District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.19

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This subchapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.) (“Electronic Signatures Act”), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of the Electronic Signatures Act, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of the Electronic Signatures Act.

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606

History